Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.250

Death benefits.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the accumulated contributions standing to that member's credit in the retirement system at the time of the member's death, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, the member's accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact that spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal representatives.

(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:

(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.37.210, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor option under RCW 41.37.170 and, except under subsection (4) of this section, if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as described in RCW 41.37.210; if a surviving spouse who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the member under the age of majority, then the child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share and share alike, until the child or children reach the age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the member's death, the member's child or children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance, share and share alike, calculated under this section making the assumption that the ages of the spouse and member were equal at the time of the member's death; or

(b) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.

(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten years of service dies and is not survived by a spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:

(a) To a person or persons, estate, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or

(b) If there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal representatives.

(4) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as determined by the director of the department of labor and industries, or a member who has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, is not subject to reduction under RCW 41.37.210. The member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.37.190.

[ 2009 c 226 s 10; 2005 c 327 s 7; 2004 c 242 s 31.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 327 ss 4-7: See note following RCW 41.37.010.